Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.18. A. The Director of the Department of
Corrections medical director of the Department of Corrections shall
have the authority to request the Executive Director of the Pardon
and Parole Board to place an inmate on the Pardon and Parole Board
docket for a medical reason, out of the normal processing
procedures. Documentation of the medical condition of such inmate
shall be certified by the medical director of the Department of
Corrections. The Pardon and Parole Board shall have the authority
to bring any such inmate before the Board at any time, except as
otherwise provided in subsection B of this section.
B. When a request is made for a medical parole review of an
inmate who is dying or is near death or is medically frail or is
medically vulnerable as defined in subsection F of this section as
certified by the medical director of the Department of Corrections
or whose medical condition has rendered the inmate no longer an

unreasonable threat to public safety, the Executive Director shall
place such inmate on the first available parole review docket for a
compassionate parole consideration. Inmates who meet the criteria
set out in this section are not subject to the two-stage hearing
process in subsection D of Section 332.7 of this title.
C. No person shall be eligible for consideration for medical
parole without the concurrence of at least three members of the
Pardon and Parole Board. The vote on whether or not to consider
such person for parole and the names of the concurring Board members
shall be set forth in the written minutes of the meeting of the
Board at which the issue is considered.
D. In the event that it is determined that the continuation of
the medical parole presents an increased risk to the public, the
parolee shall be subject to parole revocation. In such case, the
Department of Corrections shall follow the revocation procedure for
violators of parole set forth in Section 516 of this title.
E. The provisions of this section shall not apply to inmates
serving a sentence of life without possibility of parole.
F. As used in this section:
1. “Medically frail” means an individual with a medical
condition which precludes the individual from performing two or more
activities of daily living on their his or her own;
2. “Medically vulnerable” means an individual with one or more
medical conditions which makes make the individual more likely to
contract an illness or disease while incarcerated that could lead to
death or cause an individual to become medically frail. The
provisions of this subsection paragraph shall only apply during a
catastrophic health emergency as declared by the Governor of this
state pursuant to the provisions of Section 6403 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
3. “Medical condition” includes, but is not limited to,
debilitating health conditions occurring as a result of the
following:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1255 Page 2

a. disabling mental disorders including dementia,
Alzheimer’s disease, or similar degenerative brain
disorders,
b. Human Immunodeficiency Virus human immunodeficiency
virus (HIV) or Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome
acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS),
c. cancer,
d. cardiovascular disease,
e. chronic lung disease or asthma,
f. diabetes,
g. hepatitis C,
h. seizure disorders,
i. inmates receiving life sustaining life-sustaining care
such as feeding tubes or colostomy bags,
j. disabling neurological disorders such as multiple
sclerosis (MS) or amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS),
or
k. any other condition related to a weakened immune
system or condition that requires or is expected to
require specialty care or recurrent hospitalizations;
4. “Activities of daily living” means basic personal care and
everyday activities including tasks such as eating, toileting,
grooming, dressing, bathing, and transferring from one physical
position to another including moving from a reclining position to a
sitting or standing position, that a person cannot perform on his or
her own; and
5. “Dying” or “near death” means an individual with a medical
condition and who has an estimated life expectancy of six (6) months
or less.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1255 Page 3

G. Victim notification shall be provided as provided in
pursuant to Section 332.2 of this title and as required by Article 2
II, Section 34 of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1255 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1255 Page 5